test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-wîcihîw_gt-norm.yaml
      # X
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: nikî-wîcihikawin
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kikî-wîcihikawin
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: kî-wîcihâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: nikî-wîcihikawinân
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kikî-wîcihikawinaw, kikî-wîcihikawinânaw]
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kikî-wîcihikawinâwâw
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: kî-wîcihâwak
      PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: kî-wîcihâthiwa
      

      # Prt # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihitân
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihak
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihitakwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihakwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihaki
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimak
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihat
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihacik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimat
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihisk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihiyamiht
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihitahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihitîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihacik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimat
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimât
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihitâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihâyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihâkiht
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihitâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihâyâhkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihakihcik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâyâhk
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihâyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihâyahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâyahk
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihiyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihâyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihâyîkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihâyîkok
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâyîk
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1SgO: [î-kî-wîcihitwâw, î-kî-wîcihicik]
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihiskwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyâhkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihiyamihcik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+12PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihitahkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyîkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO+Var/East: î-kî-wîcihitîkwâw
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihâcik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimâcik
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihimit
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihimisk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihikot
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihikocik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihâthit
      # PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihikothit

      # X
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1SgO: î-kî-wîcihikawiyân
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2SgO: î-kî-wîcihikawiyan
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3SgO: î-kî-wîcihiht
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+1PlO: î-kî-wîcihikawiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+12PlO: î-kî-wîcihikawiyahk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+2PlO: î-kî-wîcihikawiyîk
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+3PlO: î-kî-wîcihihcik
      PV/î+PV/ki+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+X+4Sg/PlO: î-kî-wîcihimiht
      

      # Fut+Int # Ind

      # 1Sg
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihitin
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwî-wîcihâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihitinâwâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: niwî-wîcihâwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: niwî-wîcihimâwa
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-wîcihin
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kiwî-wîcihâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-wîcihinân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-wîcihâwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-wîcihimâwa
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwî-wîcihin
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihik
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: kiwî-wîcihinân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+12PlO: kiwî-wîcihikonaw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihikowâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: kiwî-wîcihâwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-wîcihimâwa
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihimîw
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihitinân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: niwî-wîcihânân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihitinân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: niwî-wîcihânânak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: niwî-wîcihimânâna
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+XO

      # 12Pl
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3SgO: kiwî-wîcihânaw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+3PlO: kiwî-wîcihânawak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-wîcihimânawa
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+12Pl+XO

      # 2Pl
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: kiwî-wîcihinâwâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: kiwî-wîcihâwâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kiwî-wîcihinân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kiwî-wîcihâwâwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: kiwî-wîcihimâwâwa
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+XO

      # 3Pl
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1SgO: niwî-wîcihikwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihikwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: niwî-wîcihikonânak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+12PlO: kiwî-wîcihikonawak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihikowâwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihîwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihimîwak
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+XO

      # 4Sg/Pl
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1SgO: niwî-wîcihikothiwa
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihikothiwa
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3SgO: [wî-wîcihikow, wî-wîcihik]
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+1PlO: niwî-wîcihikonâna
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+12PlO: kiwî-wîcihikonawa
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihikowâwa
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+3PlO: [wî-wîcihikowak, wî-wîcihikwak]
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihîthiwa
      # PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO: PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+XO

      # 5Sg/Pl
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihikothiwa

      # X
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1SgO: niwî-wîcihikawin
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2SgO: kiwî-wîcihikawin
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3SgO: wî-wîcihâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+1PlO: niwî-wîcihikawinân
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+12PlO: [kiwî-wîcihikawinaw, kiwî-wîcihikawinânaw]
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+2PlO: kiwî-wîcihikawinâwâw
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+3PlO: wî-wîcihâwak
      PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Ind+X+4Sg/PlO: wî-wîcihâthiwa
      

      # Fut+Int # Cnj

      # 1Sg
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: î-wî-wîcihitân
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihak
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+2PlO: î-wî-wîcihitakwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihakwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihaki
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimak
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Sg+XO

      # 2Sg
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wî-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihat
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihacik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimat
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 3Sg
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: î-wî-wîcihiyan
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: î-wî-wîcihisk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihiyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+1PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihiyamiht
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+12PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihitahk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO: î-wî-wîcihikoyîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+2PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihitîk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihacik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimat
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimât
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+2Sg+XO

      # 1Pl
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2SgO: î-wî-wîcihitâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO: î-wî-wîcihâyâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3SgO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihâkiht
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: î-wî-wîcihitâhk
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: î-wî-wîcihâyâhkwâw
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO+Var/East: î-wî-wîcihakihcik
      PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: î-wî-wîcihimâyâhk
      # PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO: PV/î+PV/wi+wîcihîw+V+TA+Cnj+1Pl+XO
